src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verbal morphology
! ================= !


!! ## The declension classes
! ======================


!! ### Auxiliaries
! -----------

LEXICON AUX
bos+V:     COPULA     "to be" ;   !!= * @CODE@
mos+V:     MOS        "go" ;      !!= * @CODE@
dos+V:     DOS        "come" ;    !!= * @CODE@
gul+V:     GUL        "do" ;      !!= * @CODE@


LEXICON COPULA
+Inf:bos # ;
+Inf:bones # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sit+1Sg:esov # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sit+2Sg:esos # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sit+3Sg:yma # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sit+1Pl:eson # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sit+2Pl:esowgh # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sit+3Pl:ymons # ;
+Ind+Prs+Sit+Impers:eder # ;

+Ind+Prs+Rel+3Sg:usi # ;
+Ind+Prs+Rel+3Sg:eus # ;
+Ind+Prs+Rel+3Pl:esons # ;

+Ind+Prs+1Sg:ov # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:os # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:yw # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Pl:on # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Pl:owgh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Pl:ons # ;
+Ind+Prs+Impers:or # ;

+Ind+Ipf+Sit+1Sg:esen # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Sit+2Sg:eses # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Sit+3Sg:esa # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Sit+1Pl:esen # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Sit+2Pl:esewgh # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Sit+3Pl:esens # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Sit+Impers:eses # ;

+Ind+Ipf+1Sg:en # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Sg:es # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Sg:o # ;
+Ind+Ipf+1Pl:en # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Pl:ewgh # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Pl:ens # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Impers:os # ;

+Ind+Ipf+Hab+1Sg:bedhen # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Hab+2Sg:bedhes # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Hab+3Sg:bedha # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Hab+1Pl:bedhen # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Hab+2Pl:bedhewgh # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Hab+3Pl:bedhens # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Hab+Impers:bedhes # ;

+Ind+Prt+1Sg:beuv # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:beus # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:beu # ;
+Ind+Prt+1Pl:beun # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Pl:bewgh # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Pl:bons # ;
+Ind+Prt+Impers: beus # ;

+Ind+Fut+1Sg:bedhav # ;
+Ind+Fut+2Sg:bydhydh # ;
+Ind+Fut+3Sg:bydh # ;
+Ind+Fut+1Pl:bedhons # ;
+Ind+Fut+2Pl:bedhowgh # ;
+Ind+Fut+3Pl:bedhons # ;
+Ind+Fut+Impers:bedher # ;

+Sbj+Prs+1Sg:biv # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Sg:bi # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Sg:bo # ;
+Sbj+Prs+1Pl:byn # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Pl:bowgh # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Pl:bons # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Impers:ber # ;

+Sbj+Imp+1Sg:ben # ;
+Sbj+Imp+2Sg:bes # ;
+Sbj+Imp+3Sg:be # ;
+Sbj+Imp+1Pl:ben # ;
+Sbj+Imp+2Pl:bewgh # ;
+Sbj+Imp+3Pl:bens # ;
+Sbj+Imp+Impers:bes # ;


LEXICON MOS
+Inf:mos # ;
+Inf:mones # ;

+Ind+Prs+1Sg:av # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:edh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:a # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Pl:en # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Pl:ewgh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Pl:ons # ;
+Ind+Prs+Impers:er # ;

+Ind+Prt+1Sg:yth # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ythys # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:eth # ;
+Ind+Prt+1Pl:ethen # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Pl:ethewgh # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Pl:ethons # ;
+Ind+Prt+Impers:es # ;

+Ind+Ipf+1Sg:en # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Sg:es # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Sg:e # ;
+Ind+Ipf+1Pl:en # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Pl:ewgh # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Pl:ens # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Impers:os # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Impers:es # ;

+Ind+Prf+1Sg:galsov # ;
+Ind+Prf+2Sg:galsos # ;
+Ind+Prf+3Sg:gallas # ;
+Ind+Prf+1Pl:galson # ;
+Ind+Prf+2Pl:galsowgh # ;
+Ind+Prf+3Pl:galsons # ;

+Ind+Plf+1Sg:gylsen # ;
+Ind+Plf+2Sg:gylses # ;
+Ind+Plf+3Sg:galsa # ;
+Ind+Plf+1Pl:gylsen # ;
+Ind+Plf+2Pl:gylsewgh # ;
+Ind+Plf+3Pl:glysens # ;

+Sbj+Prs+1Sg:ylliv # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Sg:ylli # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Sg:ello # ;
+Sbj+Prs+1Pl:yllyn # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Pl:yllowgh # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Pl:ellons # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Impers:eller # ;

+Sbj+Ipf+1Sg:ellen # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+2Sg:elles # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+3Sg:ella # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+1Pl:ellen # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+2Pl:ellewgh # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+3Pl:ellens # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+Impers:elles # ;

+Imp+2Sg:ke # ;
+Imp+2Sg:a # ;
+Imp+3Sg:es # ;
+Imp+1Pl:deun # ;
+Imp+2Pl:kewgh # ;
+Imp+2Pl:ewgh # ;
+Imp+3Pl:ens # ;

+Ptc: gyllys # ;

LEXICON DOS
+Inf:dos # ;
+Inf:dones #;
+Inf:devones #;

+Ind+Prs+1Sg:dov # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:deudh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:deu # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Pl:deun # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Pl:dewgh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Pl:dons # ;
+Ind+Prs+Impers:deer # ;

+Ind+Prt+1Sg:deuth # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:deuthys # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:deuth # ;
+Ind+Prt+1Pl:deuthen # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Pl:deuthewgh # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Pl:deuthons # ;
+Ind+Prt+Impers:deuthes # ;

+Ind+Ipf+1Sg:den # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Sg:des # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Sg:do # ;
+Ind+Ipf+1Pl:den # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Pl:dewgh # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Pl:dens # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Impers:des # ;

+Ind+Prf+1Sg:deuvev # ;
+Ind+Prf+2Sg:deuves # ;
+Ind+Prf+3Sg:deuva # ;
+Ind+Prf+1Pl:deuven # ;
+Ind+Prf+2Pl:deuvewgh # ;
+Ind+Prf+3Pl:deuvons # ;
+Ind+Prf+Impers:deuves # ;

+Ind+Plf+1Sg:dothyen # ;
+Ind+Plf+2Sg:dothyes # ;
+Ind+Plf+3Sg:dothya # ;
+Ind+Plf+1Pl:dothyen # ;
+Ind+Plf+2Pl:dothyewgh # ;
+Ind+Plf+3Pl:dothyens # ;
+Ind+Plf+Impers:dothyes # ;

+Sbj+Prs+1Sg:dyffiv # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Sg:dyffi # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Sg:deffo # ;
+Sbj+Prs+1Pl:dyfyn # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Pl:dyffowgh # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Pl:deffons # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Impers:deffer # ;

+Sbj+Ipf+1Sg:deffen # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+2Sg:deffes # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+3Sg:deffa # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+1Pl:deffen # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+2Pl:deffewgh # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+3Pl:deffens # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+Impers:deffes # ;

+Imp+2Sg:deus # ;
+Imp+3Sg:des # ;
+Imp+1Pl:deun # ;
+Imp+2Pl:dewgh # ;
+Imp+3Pl:dens # ;

+Ptc: devedhys # ;

LEXICON GUL

+Inf:gul # ;
+Inf:gwul # ;
+Inf:gwruthyl # ;

+Ind+Prs+1Sg:gwrav # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gwredh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Sg:gwra # ;
+Ind+Prs+1Pl:gwren # ;
+Ind+Prs+2Pl:gwrewgh # ;
+Ind+Prs+3Pl:gwrons # ;
+Ind+Prs+Impers:gwrer # ;

+Ind+Prt+1Sg:gwrug # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Sg:gwrussys # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Sg:gwrug # ;
+Ind+Prt+1Pl:gwrussyn # ;
+Ind+Prt+2Pl:gwrussewgh # ;
+Ind+Prt+3Pl:gwrussons # ;
+Ind+Prt+Impers:gwrug # ;

+Ind+Ipf+1Sg:gwren # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Sg:gwres # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Sg:gwre # ;
+Ind+Ipf+1Pl:gwren # ;
+Ind+Ipf+2Pl:gwrewgh # ;
+Ind+Ipf+3Pl:gwrens # ;
+Ind+Ipf+Impers:gwres # ;

+Ind+Plf+1Sg:gwrussen # ;
+Ind+Plf+2Sg:gwrusses # ;
+Ind+Plf+3Sg:gwrussa # ;
+Ind+Plf+1Pl:gwrussen # ;
+Ind+Plf+2Pl:gwrussewgh # ;
+Ind+Plf+3Pl:gwrussens # ;
+Ind+Plf+Impers:gwrussys # ;

+Sbj+Prs+1Sg:gwrylliv # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Sg:gwrylli # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Sg:gwrello # ;
+Sbj+Prs+1Pl:gwryllyn # ;
+Sbj+Prs+2Pl:gwryllowgh # ;
+Sbj+Prs+3Pl:gwrellons # ;
+Sbj+Prs+Impers:gwreller # ;

+Sbj+Ipf+1Sg:gwrellen # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+2Sg:gwrelles # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+3Sg:gwrella # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+1Pl:gwrellen # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+2Pl:gwrellewgh # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+3Pl:gwrellens # ;
+Sbj+Ipf+Impers:gwrellys # ;

+Imp+2Sg:gwra # ;
+Imp+3Sg:gwres # ;
+Imp+1Pl:gwren # ;
+Imp+2Pl:gwrewgh # ;
+Imp+3Pl:gwrens # ;

+Ptc: gwrys # ;




! ============= !
! ============= !
! Regular verbs
! ============= !
! ============= !


LEXICON vb1 ! class 1
     +V+Inf:%>a  #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:     indpres ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:     indpret ;
 +V+Ind+Ipf:     indimpf ;
 +V+Ind+Plf:     pluperf ;
 +V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
 +V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
     +V+Imp:     imp     ;

LEXICON vbya ! classv2
     +V+Inf:%>ya #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:     indpres ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:     indpret ;
 +V+Ind+Ipf:     indimpf ;
 +V+Ind+Plf:     pluperf ;
 +V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
 +V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
     +V+Imp:%>y  imp     ;

LEXICON vbi ! class 3
+V+Inf:%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Prs: indpres ;
+V+Ind+Prt: indpret ;
+V+Ind+Ipf: indimpf ;
+V+Ind+Plf: pluperf ;
+V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
+V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
+V+Imp: imp ;

LEXICON vbhe ! class 4
+V+Inf:%>e # ;
+V+Ind+Prs: indpres1sg ; ! regular
+V+Ind+Prs: indpres3sg-a ; ! special
+V+Ind+Prs: indpresrest ; ! rest
+V+Ind+Prt:%^TRUNC indpret ;
+V+Ind+Ipf: indimpf ;
+V+Ind+Plf:a pluperf ;
+V+Sbj+Prs:%>ah sbjpres ;
+V+Sbj+Ipf:%>ah sbjimpf ;
!+V+Sbj+Prs:%>ah%^CD sbjpres ;
!+V+Sbj+Ipf:%>ah%^CD sbjimpf ;
+V+Imp:ah imp ;

LEXICON vb ! regular verbs
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Ind+Prs: indpres ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%^TRUNC%>a indpret ;
+V+Ind+Ipf: indimpf ;
+V+Ind+Plf: pluperf ;
+V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
+V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
+V+Imp: imp ; !XXX check


!LEXICON vb-y ! class ?? ! verbs with -yn etc. ipf
!+V+Inf: # ;
!+V+Ind+Prs: indpres ;
!+V+Ind+Prt: indpret ;
!+V+Ind+Ipf: indimpf-y ; ! special y form
!+V+Ind+Plf: pluperf ;
!+V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
!+V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
!+V+Imp: imp ; ! XXX check

LEXICON ERHI
+V+Inf:%^V%>i # ;
+V+Ind+Prs: indpres1sg ;
+V+Ind+Prs:%^V indpresrest ;
+V+Ind+Prt: indpret ;
+V+Ind+Ipf: indimpf ;
+V+Ind+Plf: pluperf ;
+V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
+V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
+V+Imp: imp ; ! XXX check

LEXICON TAVA
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Ind+Prs: indpres ;
+V+Ind+Prt: indpret ;
+V+Ind+Ipf: indimpf ;
+V+Ind+Plf: pluperf ;
+V+Sbj+Prs:%^CD sbjpres ;
+V+Sbj+Ipf:%^CD sbjimpf ;
+V+Imp: imp ; ! XXX check


! The verbal continuation lexica
! ==============================

LEXICON indpres
 indpres1sg ;
 indpres3sg ;
 indpresrest ;
