src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
erhi:arha ERHI "command, order, require, bid" ;
tava:tav TAVA "touch, stroke " ;
asver:asver vb "restore (fig.)" ;
dannvon:dannvon vb "send, dispatch, report" ;
dasleverel:dasleverel vb "repeat, resay, restate" ;
dehweles:dehwel vb "return, come back, atone" ;
diswruthyl:diswruthyl vb "undo, spoil, ruin" ;
falhas:falh vb "scythe, mow" ;
gonis:gonis vb "work, toil, labour" ;
gweres:gwer vb "help, aid, assist" ;
kaboli:kabol vb "stir, splash, mix" ;
keles:kel vb "hide, conceal, keep secret" ;
kollenki:kollenk vb "swallow" ;
kryghlemmel:kryghlemmel vb "somersault" ;
lyfansas:lyfans vb "hop like a toad" ;
omdhisevel:omdhisevel vb "overbalance, stumble, trip and fall" ;
omweskel:omweskel vb "strike oneself " ;
yn-medh:yn-medh vb "says, said, quoth" ;
bera:ber vb1 "flow" ;
dastesedha:dastesedh vb1 "re-adjust" ;
didhena:didhen vb1 "wean" ;
diwessa:diwess vb1 "go drinking, booze" ;
fardella:fardell vb1 "package" ;
gobra:gobr vb1 "pay wages to, reward, remunerate" ;
gwanna:gwann vb1 "weaken" ;
hwithra:hwithr vb1 "examine, investigate, scrutinize, probe, carry out research" ;
kenkia:kenki vb1 "contend" ;
kogrenna:kogrenn vb1 "meander" ;
krohena:krohen vb1 "flay" ;
leytha:leyth vb1 "humidify, moisten, rot through damp" ;
moldra:moldr vb1 "murder, assassinate" ;
omladha:omladh vb1 "kill oneself, commit suicide" ;
tolla:toll vb1 "deceive, cheat, fool " ;
ystynna:ystynn vb1 "extend" ;
bludhhe:bludhh vbhe "tenderize" ;
byhanhe:byhanh vbhe "reduce, make smaller" ;
downhe:downh vbhe "deepen" ;
duwanhe:duwanh vbhe "grieve" ;
glanhe:glanh vbhe "clean, clear" ;
gwethhe:gwethh vbhe "worsen, deteriorate" ;
heudhhe:heudhh vbhe "gladden, ease, make happy, be glad, be eased" ;
kaleshe:kalesh vbhe "harden" ;
koselhe:koselh vbhe "quieten, pacify, soothe" ;
krevhe:krevh vbhe "strengthen, make strong" ;
levenhe:levenh vbhe "smooth, level" ;
lowenhe:lowenh vbhe "rejoice, comfort, make glad" ;
meurhe:meurh vbhe "magnify, make great" ;
ombellhe:ombellh vbhe "distance oneself" ;
palshe:palsh vbhe "abound, multiply (intrans.), " ;
tommhe:tommh vbhe "warm" ;
yeynhe:yeynh vbhe "cool, chill" ;
boksusi:boksus vbi "box, cuff, slap, punch, boxing" ;
degevi:degev vbi "pay tithes" ;
dillasi:dillas vbi "clothe" ;
dyski:dysk vbi "learn, train, educate, teach, instruct" ;
goleski:golosk vbi "singe, char, smoulder" ;
havi:hav vbi "pass the summer" ;
karoli:karol vbi "dance to sung music" ;
kevanedhi:kevanedh vbi "occupy" ;
lenni:lenn vbi "veil, cover, clothe" ;
ombareusi:ombareus vbi "prepare oneself" ;
perthi:porth vbi "bear" ;
tolli:toll vbi "levy tax, tax" ;
attendya:attend vbya "notice, pay attention, take note of" ;
bryvya:bryv vbya "bleat" ;
desinya:desin vbya "design" ;
dissernya:dissern vbya "discern" ;
fondya:fond vbya "found, institute, establish, lay foundations" ;
gryllya:gryll vbya "chirp" ;
kachya:kach vbya "catch, seize, snatch" ;
komunya:komun vbya "take the sacrament, take Communion" ;
lackya:lack vbya "lack" ;
moutya:mout vbya "moult, sulk, mope" ;
parkya:park vbya "park, enclose" ;
troyllya:troyll vbya "spin around" ;
bargydnya:bargydn vbya ;
deklinya:deklin vbya ;
eksamnya:eksamn vbya ;
franklondya:franklond vbya ;
islinya:islin vbya ;
konfondya:konfond vbya ;
pasteurya:pasteur vbya ;
profya:prof vbya ;
settya:sett vbya ;
sordya:sord vbya ;
ynklinya:ynklin vbya ;
delenwel vb "influence" ;
gobalas vb "skim" ;
kaskyrghes vb "campaign" ;
lostleverel vb "prompt" ;
pregoth vb "preach" ;
yns vb "they are" ;
dasperna vb1 "buy back" ;
eghoka vb1 "fish for salmon" ;
gwersella vb1 "encamp" ;
kesstrotha vb1 "compact" ;
letheredna vb1 "spell" ;
ottra vb1 "utter" ;
ronsona vb1 "ransom" ;
tavosa vb1 "scold" ;
boghosekhe vbhe "impoverish" ;
gwadnhe vbhe "weaken" ;
krefhe vbhe "strengthen" ;
purhe vbhe "purify" ;
tekhe vbhe "adorn" ;
boksuji vbi "box" ;
digleveji vbi "disinfect" ;
dri vbi "bring" ;
goi vbi "digest" ;
kabmdybi vbi "err" ;
kowlleski vbi "burn up" ;
oferedni vbi "celebrate mass" ;
paruji vbi "prepare" ;
reverthi vbi "flood" ;
steuvi vbi "warp" ;
